Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-204
Attorney General; power in counties concurrent with county attorney.

The Attorney General and the Department of Justice shall have the same powers and prerogatives in each of the several counties of the state as the county attorneys have in their respective counties.

Laws 1919, c. 205, § 4, p. 905;

C.S.1922, § 4837;

C.S.1929, § 84-204;

R.S.1943, § 84-204.

Attorney General has same authority to prosecute exceptions in the Supreme Court as the county attorney. State v. Hutter, 145 Neb. 798, 18 N.W.2d 203 (1945).

Attorney General has right to invoke judgment of appellate court by writ of error to State Board of Equalization upon order reducing assessments entered by board. State ex rel. Sorensen v. State Board of Equalization and Assessment, 123 Neb. 259, 242 N.W. 609 (1932), 243 N.W. 264 (1932).

Assistant attorney general has no authority to make and sign information in his own name, and information so signed is nullity. Lower v. State, 106 Neb. 666, 184 N.W. 174 (1921).